Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 12 BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS
31-25-1219. Special assessments.

In order to defray all or any portion of the costs of the improvements provided by the district, the board may establish special improvement districts within the boundaries of the district. Such special improvement districts may be established whenever in the opinion of the board property in the district will be especially benefited by such improvements. The method of creating special improvement districts, making the improvements, and assessing the costs thereof shall be as provided in part 5 of this article; except that the electors eligible to vote on the question shall be electors as defined in section 31-25-1203 (4) of the district or the special improvement district, as determined by the board, the board shall perform the duties of the governing body, the secretary of the district shall perform the duties of the clerk, and the improvements which may be constructed shall be the improvements which the district is permitted to provide pursuant to this part 12.

In order to defray all or any portion of the costs of providing services, the board may impose special assessments wholly or in part upon real property located within the boundaries of the district. Prior to imposing a special assessment, the board shall adopt a resolution setting a date, which shall be not less than twenty days nor more than forty days after the adoption of the resolution, a time, and a location for a hearing on the question of the imposition of such special assessment and the benefit to be derived by the property upon which such special assessment will be imposed. The resolution shall include a form of notice, which shall describe the property on which the assessment shall be levied, the purposes for which the assessment is to be levied, the proposed method of assessment and the manner of payment thereof, and the right of the owners of the property to be assessed to file a remonstrance petition. Thereupon, the board shall give the notice by publication and cause a copy of said notice to be mailed by first-class mail to each owner of the property to be assessed at his last-known address, as disclosed by the tax records of the county or counties in which the district is located.

On the date and at the time and place specified in the notice, the board shall conduct a hearing for the purpose of considering the desirability of and the need for providing the service and imposing the assessment therefor and determining the special benefits to be received by the properties to be assessed. No assessment shall be imposed if a remonstrance petition objecting to the assessment and signed by the owners of the property which would bear more than one-half of the proposed assessment is filed with the board prior to or at the hearing. After the hearing, the board shall adopt a resolution either approving or disapproving the proposed assessment. The resolution shall apportion the relative benefits to the real properties benefited by the service. Thereafter, the board shall cause to be prepared a local assessment roll. All assessments shall be due and payable at the time and place specified in the assessing resolution and said assessments shall become delinquent if not paid with thirty days of such due date.

The board shall cause to be mailed by first-class mail to each owner of property specified on the assessment roll a notice of the amount of the assessment, the due date, and a statement that the assessment shall constitute a perpetual lien from the date of mailing of the notice in the amount assessed against each lot or tract of land, and a statement that such lien shall have priority over all other liens except general tax liens. As to any subsequent subdivision of any lot or tract of land assessed, the assessment may be apportioned by the board in such manner, if any, as may be provided in the assessing resolution. If any court of competent jurisdiction sets aside any assessment for irregularity in the proceedings, the board may make a new assessment in accordance with the provisions of this subsection (2). If an assessment is not paid within thirty days after its due date, penalty interest on the amount of the assessment shall accrue at the rate established pursuant to section 5-12-106 (2) and (3), C.R.S., until the date of sale or payment.

The assessments imposed by this section shall be collected by the officer of the district designated in the assessment resolution or, by agreement with the municipality, by the municipal treasurer. In the case of a default in the payment of any assessment, the collection officer shall certify to the county treasurer the whole amount of the unpaid assessments. The county treasurer shall advertise and sell all property concerning which such a default has occurred for the payment of the whole of the unpaid assessment, plus penalties and costs of collection. Such advertisement and sale shall be made at the same times, in the same manner, under all the same conditions and penalties, and with the same effect as provided by general law for sales of real estate and default of payment of the general property tax.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1138, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1770, § 70, effective July 1.

31-25-1220. Inclusion or exclusion - petition - notice - hearing.

The boundaries of any district organized under the provisions of this part 12 may be changed in the manner prescribed in this section, but the change of boundaries of the district shall not impair or affect its organization or its rights in or to property or any of its rights or privileges whatsoever, nor shall it affect or impair or discharge any contract, obligation, lien, or charge for or upon which the district might be liable or chargeable had any such change of boundaries not been made. The owners of property proposed to be included or excluded may file with the governing body a petition, in writing, requesting that such property be included in or excluded from the district. The petition shall describe the property owned by the petitioners and shall be verified. The petition shall be accompanied by a deposit of moneys sufficient to pay all costs of the inclusion or exclusion proceedings. The clerk of the governing body shall cause notice of the filing of such petition to be given and published, which notice shall state the filing of such petition, the names of the petitioners, descriptions of the property sought to be included or excluded, and the request of said petitioners.

Such notice shall inform all persons having objections to appear at the time and place stated in said notice and show cause why the petition should not be granted. The governing body, at the time and place mentioned or at any time to which the hearing may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto which may be presented by any person showing cause why said petition should not be granted. The failure of any interested person to show cause shall be deemed as an assent on his part to the inclusion or exclusion of such property as requested for in the petition. If the change of boundaries of the district does not adversely affect the district and if the petition is granted, the governing body shall adopt an ordinance to that effect and file a certified copy of the same with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the property is located. Thereupon, said property shall be included or excluded from the district.

All property included within or excluded from a district shall thereafter be subject to the levy of taxes for the payment of its proportionate share of any indebtedness of the district outstanding at the time of inclusion or exclusion.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1139, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 761, § 7, effective May 20.

31-25-1221. Board can issue bonds - form.

To carry out the purposes of this part 12, the board, with the approval of the municipality if the board is appointed pursuant to section 31-25-1209 (1)(b) or (1)(c), is hereby authorized to issue bonds of the district. Such bonds shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized, payable at such times as determined by the board, and shall be due and payable in installments at such times as determined by the board extending not more than twenty years from the date of issuance. The form and terms of said bonds, including provisions for their sale, payment, and redemption, shall be determined by the board. If such bonds are payable from the general ad valorem taxes of the district, such bonds shall not be issued unless first approved at an election held pursuant to section 31-25-1222. Bonds payable solely from revenues derived from sources other than the district's general ad valorem tax may be issued without an election. If the board so determines, such bonds may be redeemable prior to maturity, with or without payment of a premium, but no premium shall exceed three percent of the principal thereof. The bonds shall be executed in the name of and on behalf of the district and signed by the presiding officer of the board with the seal of the district affixed thereto and attested by the secretary of the board. Such bonds shall be in such denominations as the board shall determine. Interest coupons, if any, shall bear the original or facsimile signature of the presiding officer of the board. Under no circumstances shall any of said bonds be held to be an indebtedness, an obligation, or a liability of the municipality in which the district is located, and bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this part 12 shall contain a statement to that effect.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1140, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1222. Submission of debt question.

When any board determines that the interest of said district and the public interest or necessity demand the acquisition, construction, installation, or completion of any improvements or the provision of any service within the district or the making of any contract with the United States or with any person or corporation to carry out the objects or purposes of said district requiring the creation of an indebtedness, said board shall order the submission to the electors of the proposition of issuing such obligations or bonds or creating other indebtedness at an election held for that purpose. Such election shall be held and conducted and the results thereof declared in the manner provided in part 8 of article 1 of title 32, C.R.S. Any such election may be held, on any date selected by the board, separately or may be consolidated or held concurrently with any other regular or special election. The declaration of public interest or necessity required and the provisions for the holding of such election may be included within one and the same resolution, which, in addition to such declaration of public interest or necessity, shall recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the works or improvements, as the case may be, the amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum net effective interest rate to be paid on such indebtedness.

Such resolution shall also fix the date upon which such election shall be held and the manner of holding the same and the method of voting for or against the incurring of the proposed indebtedness or the making of the proposed contract. Such resolution shall appoint a designated election official and provide for the duties thereof.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 96, p. 1771, § 71, effective July 1, 1996.)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1141, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 96:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1771, § 71, effective July 1.

31-25-1223. Effect - subsequent elections.

If any such proposition is approved at such election in the manner required by part 8 of article 1 of title 32, C.R.S., the district is authorized to incur such indebtedness or obligation, enter into such contract, or issue and sell such bonds of the district, as the case may be, all for the purposes and objects specified in the proposition submitted, in the amount so provided, and at a rate of interest such that the maximum net effective interest rate specified in the proposal is not exceeded. The bonds may be sold at public or private sale, as determined by the board to be in the best interests of the district. Submission of the proposition of incurring such obligation or bonded or other indebtedness at such an election shall not prevent or prohibit submission of the same or other propositions at subsequent elections called for such purpose.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1141, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1224. Confirmation of contract proceedings.

In its discretion, the board may file a petition at any time in the district court in and for any county in which the district is located, praying for a judicial examination and determination of any power conferred, or of any securities issued or merely authorized to be issued, or of any taxes, assessments, or service charges levied or otherwise made or contracted to be levied or otherwise made, or of any other act, proceeding, or contract of the district, whether or not such act, proceeding, or contract has been taken or executed, including proposed contracts for any improvement, proposed securities of the district to defray wholly or in part the cost of the project, and the proposed acquisition, improvement, equipment, maintenance, operation, or disposal of any property pertaining thereto (or any combination thereof).

Such petition shall:

Set forth the facts whereon the validity of such power, securities, taxes, assessments, charges, act, proceeding, or contract is founded; and

Be verified by the presiding officer of the district.

Such action shall be in the nature of a proceeding in rem, and jurisdiction of all parties interested may be had by publication and posting, as provided in this part 12.

Notice of the filing of the petition shall be given by the clerk of the court, under the seal thereof, stating in brief outline the contents of the petition and showing where a full copy of any proceeding or contract therein mentioned may be examined.

The notice shall be served:

By publication at least once a week for five consecutive weeks by five weekly insertions in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality in which the district is located;

By posting in the office of the district at least thirty days prior to the date fixed in the notice for the hearing on the petition.

Jurisdiction shall be complete after such publication and posting.

Any owner of property within the boundaries of the district or any other person interested in the proceeding or contract or proposed proceeding or proposed contract or in the premises may appear and move to dismiss or answer the petition no less than five days prior to the date fixed for the hearing or within such further time as may be allowed by the court. The petition shall be taken as confessed by all persons who fail so to appear.

The petition and notice shall be sufficient to give the court jurisdiction, and, upon hearing, the court shall examine into and determine all matters and things affecting the question submitted, shall make such findings with reference thereto, and shall render such judgment and decree thereon as the case warrants.

Costs may be divided or apportioned among any contesting parties in the discretion of the trial court.

Review of the judgment of the court may be had as in other similar cases; except that such review shall be applied for within thirty days after the time of the rendition of such judgment or within such additional time as may be allowed by the court within thirty days.

The Colorado rules of civil procedure shall govern in matters of pleading and practice where not otherwise specified in this part 12.

The court shall disregard any error, irregularity, or omission which does not affect the substantial rights of the parties.

All cases in which there may arise a question of the validity of any matter provided for under this section shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern and shall be heard at the earliest practicable moment.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1141, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1225. Dissolution procedure.

Any district organized pursuant to this part 12 may be dissolved after notice is given, publication is made, and a hearing is held in the manner prescribed by sections 31-25-1206 and 31-25-1207. The dissolution of the district may be initiated by filing in the office of the clerk of the governing body either a petition signed by the persons described in section 31-25-1205 (2) or, in the case of a district which has not filed an operating plan and budget as required by section 31-25-1211 for two years, a resolution of the governing body. After hearing any protests against or objections to dissolution and if the governing body determines that it is for the best interests of all concerned to dissolve the district, it shall so provide by an effective ordinance, a certified copy of which shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder in each of the counties in which the district or any part thereof is located. Upon such filing, the dissolution shall be complete. However, no district shall be dissolved until it has satisfied or paid in full all of its outstanding indebtedness, obligations, and liabilities or until funds are on deposit and available therefor. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, upon petition of persons who own real or personal property in the service area of the proposed district having a valuation for assessment of not less than fifty percent, or such greater amount as the governing body may provide by ordinance, of the valuation for assessment of all real and personal property in the service area of the proposed district and who own at least fifty percent, or such greater amount as the governing body may provide by ordinance, of the acreage in the proposed district, the district shall be prohibited from incurring any new or increased financial obligations, shall impose its existing taxes, fees, and assessments solely to meet any existing financial obligations, and shall be dissolved as soon as the district has no outstanding financial obligations.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1143, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 762, § 8, effective May 20.

31-25-1226. Correction of faulty notices.

In any case that a notice is provided for in this part 12 in which the governing body finds for any reason that due notice was not given, the governing body shall not thereby lose jurisdiction, and the proceeding in question shall not thereby be void or be abated; but the governing body, in that case, shall order due notice given and shall continue the proceeding until such time as notice is properly given and thereupon shall proceed as though notice had been properly given in the first instance.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1143, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1227. Department of transportation and municipal jurisdiction unimpaired.

Nothing in this part 12 shall affect or impair the control and jurisdiction which the department of transportation has over streets and highways which are part of the state highway system or which a municipality has over all property within its boundaries. All powers granted by this part 12 shall be subject to such control and jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1143, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1070, § 44, effective July 1.

31-25-1228. Method not exclusive.

Nothing in this part 12 shall repeal or affect any other law or any part thereof, it being intended that this part 12 shall provide a separate method of accomplishing its objects and not an exclusive one.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1143, § 1, effective May 6.